District of Columbia statutes.
32-1231.12

Pregnant Workers Protection Fund.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the Pregnant Workers Protection Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by DOES in accordance with subsection (c) of this subsection.

(b)

The Fund shall consist of the revenue from the following sources recovered under this chapter:

(1)

Civil fines; and

(2)

Administrative penalties.

(c)

The Fund shall be used to enforce this chapter.

(d)

(1)

The money deposited into the Fund, and interest earned, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.

(2)

Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.

Mar. 3, 2015, D.C. Law 20-168, § 13, 61 DCR 11368